Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 1. Department Powers, Bank Reports, Prohibited Interests, and Department Standards.

Sec. 06.05.005.
Powers of department.

The department shall

exercise general supervision over all state financial institutions and their subsidiaries and affiliated corporations;

adopt regulations necessary to implement this chapter, including regulations providing for the retention and preservation of state bank records;

review and approve or disapprove applications for new state banks under AS

06.05.344

, new bank branches under AS

06.05.399

, and international bank branches or interstate state bank branches under AS

06.05.555

;

issue permits authorizing certain acquisitions by bank holding companies under AS

06.05.235

and

06.05.570

;

determine for each state bank the amount of paid-in capital necessary to operate under AS

06.05.305(a)

;

review and approve transfers of state bank ownership under AS

06.05.327

;

perform examinations of state banks, branch banks, and subsidiaries under AS

06.01.015

.

The department may

relieve a bank from the examination requirements of AS

06.01.015

if the bank’s deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or another agency of the United States that insures bank deposits;

approve under AS

06.05.166(f)

the operation of a branch bank on a schedule different than normal banking days;

[Repealed, § 55 ch 75 SLA 2002.]

approve certain bank subsidiaries under AS

06.05.272

;

approve under AS

06.05.205(d)

the acceptance by a bank of the bank’s stock or of the stock of the bank’s holding company as security for a loan in certain circumstances;

restrict the withdrawal of deposits from a state bank where the department finds that extraordinary circumstances make restriction necessary for the proper protection of depositors;

require a state bank to

maintain its capital and reserve accounts in amounts determined appropriate by the department, considering the size of the bank;

observe the methods and standards that the bank adopts for determining the value of various types of assets;

charge off part or all of an asset that has not been lawfully acquired;

write down an asset to its market value;

record liens and other interests in property;

obtain a financial statement from a borrower or prospective borrower to the extent that the bank can obtain the statement;

obtain insurance against damage to real property taken as security;

search, or obtain insurance of, the title to real property taken as security;

maintain adequate insurance against other risks as the department determines necessary and appropriate for the protection of depositors and the public;

charge off that portion of an asset classified as a loss, or charge off or reserve up to 50 percent of loans classified as doubtful, in a state or federal report of examination; or

charge off all debts owed to the bank in which interest is past due and unpaid for a period of six months, unless the debt principal is adequately secured and the bank is in the process of collection;

require the board of directors of a bank to hold a meeting under AS

06.05.438(f)

;

order the removal of a board member of a bank under AS

06.05.435(g)

;

order a bank to suspend the payment of dividends under AS

06.05.441(b)

;

require a bank to increase its capital accounts under AS

06.05.305(c)

;

take possession of a bank in the manner provided in AS

06.05.468(c)

, and operate, reorganize, or liquidate the bank under AS

06.05.470

—

06.05.474

after taking possession under this paragraph;

issue an order under AS

06.01.030

that the department determines is necessary to ensure compliance with this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter; and

exercise other powers expressly or implicitly granted in this chapter.

History.

(§ 2.104 A ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 157 SLA 1970; am § 54 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 2001; am §§ 8, 55 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For other powers of the department, see AS

06.01.020

and

06.01.030

.

Administrative Code. —

For powers of the department, see 3 AAC 1, art. 1.

For prohibited practices and sanctions, see 3 AAC 1, art. 3.

For powers of the department of commerce, see 3 AAC 2, art. 1.

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

For organization and corporate functions of banks, see 3 AAC 2, art. 3.

For liquidation, dissolution, and reorganization, see 3 AAC 2, art. 4.

For prohibited practices and sanctions, see 3 AAC 2, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d, Banks, § 1 et seq.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 5-32.

Sec. 06.05.010.
Notice and hearing. [Repealed, § 54 ch 169 SLA 1978. For current law, see AS 06.01.030.]

Secs. 06.05.015 — 06.05.040.
Powers over state banks; miscellaneous powers of department; bank examinations; banks exempt from examination; examination fee; examiner’s oath. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.045.
Bank reports to the department.

Each state bank shall make at least four reports of condition each year to the department on days designated by, and on forms prescribed by, the department. The report shall be signed by a duly authorized officer of the bank and shall be signed by at least three directors who certify under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree under AS

11.56.210

that they, and each of them, have personal knowledge of the facts stated in the report and that the facts are true. The reports must exhibit in detail and under appropriate heads the resources and liabilities of the bank and must be received by the department within 30 calendar days after the end of the period covered by the report.

The department may require special reports from a bank whenever in its judgment they are necessary in order to obtain a full knowledge of its condition.

Each state bank shall make at least one report of income and dividends to the department each year. The report shall be submitted to the department within 30 days following the end of the calendar year covered in the report.

History.

(§ 2.109 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 3 ch 230 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For powers of the department of commerce, see 3 AAC 2, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking § 28.

Sec. 06.05.050.
Publication of reports.

Condensed forms of all reports of condition required by AS

06.05.045(a)

shall be immediately

published by the state bank in a newspaper of general circulation published in the place where the state bank is located; if a newspaper of general circulation is not published in that place, the report shall be published in the newspaper of general circulation published nearest to that place; or

posted

at the primary Internet website of the state bank; and

in the lobby of the principal office and all branches of the state bank.

Notice of the publication or posting of the reports of condition under (a) of this section shall be posted in the lobby of the principal office and all branches of the state bank. Upon request, a copy of a report of condition shall be supplied to any person at no cost.

History.

(§ 2.110 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 3 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Secs. 06.05.055,
06.05.060.
Annual report of department; records of department. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.065.
Financial institution interest of department officers and employees.

A bank examiner of the department who deals with the regulation of financial institutions, a special agent selected by the department to do work relating to financial institutions, the commissioner or deputy commissioner, or the director of banking may not be an officer, employee, director, trustee, attorney, shareholder, or partner of a financial institution, or receive, directly or indirectly, a payment or gratuity from a financial institution. A person subject to this section may not borrow money from a state financial institution, except as provided in this section.

A person subject to this section may

be a depositor in a financial institution;

purchase shares of a savings and loan association on the same terms available to the public;

be a member of an employee credit union;

be indebted to a state financial institution upon an installment debt incurred by the employee in the purchase of goods for personal use only and transferred to the financial institution in the regular course of business, including debts for household goods, mobile homes, motor vehicles, or boats; or

retain a preexisting extension of credit that was incurred before commencement of the employment that subjected the person to this section; any renegotiation of a preexisting extension of credit shall be treated as a new extension of credit that is subject to the prohibitions of this section.

This section does not limit the authority of an officer or employee of the department acting in the person’s official capacity in the business of the department.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

History.

(§ 2.113 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 1964; am § 17 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 11, 12, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993; am §§ 10, 11 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Sec. 06.05.070.
Preservation of bank records. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.075.
Standards.

The department, in the exercise of its authority under this chapter, shall act in the interests of promoting and maintaining a sound and competitive banking system, the security of deposits and customers, the liquid position of banks, and the prevention of injurious credit expansions and contractions.

History.

(§ 2.116 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 6 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 13 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For prohibited practices and sanctions, see 3 AAC 1, art. 3.

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

For liquidation, dissolution, and reorganization, see 3 AAC 2, art. 4.

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 6, art. 2.

Secs. 06.05.080,
06.05.085.
Effect of invalidity of order or regulation; limitation of personal liability. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]